Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 5
HISTORIC CHATTAHOOCHEE COMPACT

Cross references.

- Powers and duties of department relating to development of Chattahoochee River Basin,

§

12-5-400

et seq.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Chattahoochee Basin Downstream Assistance (CBDA) Grant Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Grant Programs, Sec. 391-3-21-06.

12-10-80 and 12-10-81.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 115, § 1/HB 777, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor's notes.

- This article consisted of Code Sections 12-10-80 and 12-10-81, relating to the Historic Chattahoochee Compact, and was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 1497,

§§

1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 429,

§

1.